Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-3,108
Streets; improvements; control of work; regulations.

A city shall have the right to control and direct all work upon the public streets. The city may adopt any and all reasonable regulations relating to excavations in the streets or public grounds by any and all parties, including waterworks, gas, and other franchised corporations or public contractors, enforce such regulations, and impose penalties for the violation of such regulations as may be deemed proper.

Laws 1959, c. 36, § 25, p. 205;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 113.
July 21, 2022